Arkansas, session 2025, SB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Judicial Resources Assessment Committee has reviewed the
caseloads of the various judicial districts; and
(2) One (1) additional circuit judgeship is needed in the
Nineteenth Judicial District-West to ensure the smooth, efficient, and timely
administration of justice.
(b) The General Assembly intends this act to:
(1) Authorize the establishment of one (1) additional circuit
judgeship in the Nineteenth Judicial District-West;
(2) Articulate the applicable election process of the additional
circuit judge; and
(3) Identify various resources that will be available for the
additional circuit judge.

*CEB146*
02/14/2025 11:35:34 AM CEB146

SB234
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-13-3002, concerning judges in the
Nineteenth Judicial District, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(j)(1) Effective April 1, 2025, there is created in the Nineteenth
Judicial District-West an additional circuit judgeship that shall have
jurisdiction in law, equity, probate, and juvenile matters.
(2)(A) The additional circuit judge shall be elected by the
qualified voters of the district, shall satisfy the same qualifications for
holding office, and shall receive the same salary, expenses, and other
allowances as provided by law for judges of the circuit courts.
(B) The circuit judge shall serve for elected terms of six
(6) years.
(3) The county that composes the Nineteenth Judicial District-
West shall provide courtroom and office facilities and supplies for the newly
created circuit judgeship created by subdivision (j)(1) of this section,
which shall be paid out of the county treasury in the same manner as other
demands against the county and out of funds appropriated by the quorum court
of the county for these purposes.
(4) There shall be provided for the circuit judgeship created by
subdivision (j)(1) of this section a court reporter and a trial court
administrator whose salaries shall be fixed and paid in the manner provided
by law for court reporters and trial court administrators of the circuit
courts of this state.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
For the circuit judgeship created in the Nineteenth Judicial District-
West, the vacancy shall be filled by election at the 2026 nonpartisan
judicial general election, with the elected circuit judge to take office on
January 1, 2027.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Judicial Resources
Assessment Committee has reviewed the caseloads of the various judicial
districts; that the caseload of the Nineteenth Judicial District-West
necessitates an additional circuit judge; and that this act is necessary to
ensure the smooth, efficient, and timely administration of justice in the
02/14/2025 11:35:34 AM CEB146

SB234
affected county. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act,
being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety,
shall become effective on April 1, 2025.

































02/14/2025 11:35:34 AM CEB146